District of Columbia statutes.
38-902

School officials not to profit on supplies or textbooks purchased for schools.

No school official, teacher, or member of the Board of Education shall receive any pecuniary benefit on account of school supplies or textbooks purchased for the use of the public schools in the District of Columbia.

Aug. 7, 1894, 28 Stat. 254, ch. 232

History

Purchase of school books and supplies, see § 38-701 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 31-2202.
1973 Ed., § 31-1104.

Prior Codifications